Wyoming, session 2026, SF0121.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 33-24-124 is amended to read:
33-24-124. Persons deemed practicing pharmacy.
(a) Any person shall be deemed to be practicing
pharmacy within the meaning of this act who provides
collaborative pharmaceutical care or prepares, or
compounds, or processes, or packages, or repackages, or
labels, or dispenses, or sells, or offers for sale, at
retail or in connection with operation of a health-care
facility, any dangerous drugs, medicines, poisons,
chemicals, narcotics, or prescriptions, which are
identified as such in accordance with this act.
(b) "Practice of pharmacy" means, but is not limited
to:
(i) Interpreting, evaluating, compounding,
dispensing or administering medical orders or
prescriptions;
(ii) Providing patient counseling;
(iii) Assessing the patient for the purpose of
prescribing drugs and devices pursuant to board of pharmacy
rules;
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0121
ENROLLED ACT NO. 65, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(iv) Initiating or providing pharmacist care
services pursuant to board of pharmacy rules;
(v) Using continuous quality improvement
programs, emerging technologies and competency-based
education to improve patient safety and the quality of
services provided;
(vi) Engaging in collaborative pharmaceutical
care.
(c) Regarding collaborative pharmaceutical care:
(i) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to
require any pharmacist to provide collaborative
pharmaceutical care. No employer shall discriminate against
a pharmacist on the basis that the pharmacist declines to
participate in a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement;
(ii) The practice of collaborative
pharmaceutical care shall be governed by board of pharmacy
rules.
Section 2. The board of pharmacy shall promulgate all
rules necessary to implement this act.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0121
ENROLLED ACT NO. 65, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3